Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB44.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3001 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authorized entity." An entity granted the authority by the commission or the coordinator to determine if an individual is a victim of human trafficking and issue victim determination statements on behalf of victims under section 3027 (relating to victim determination statement). The term includes, but is not 1234567891011121314151617181920 limited to, the following:(1) An attorney employed by a nonprofit legal aid association or society or a county bar organization that provides legal aid for victims of human trafficking in civil matters.(2) A nongovernmental organization or member of a human trafficking task force, including victim service providers affiliated with the organization or task force.(3) A nonprofit organization which principally serves victims of human trafficking.* * *"Coordinator." The entity contracted by the commission to act as the State Human Trafficking Resources Coordinator under section 3032 (relating to State Human Trafficking Resource Coordinator).* * *"Governmental entity." Any branch, subdivision or agency of:(1) The Federal Government.(2) The Commonwealth.(3) A political subdivision.(4) A municipal or local authority.* * *"Victim determination statement." A statement issued under section 3027.* * *Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3027. Victim determination statement.(a) Authorization.--A court of competent jurisdiction, governmental entity or an authorized entity may issue a victim determination statement to an individual on a form developed by 20250SB0044PN1076 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the commission or coordinator that makes a determination that the individual is a victim of human trafficking. If a victim determination statement is issued to a victim of human trafficking, the completed form shall be filed with the Office of Victim Advocate.(b) Contents.--A victim determination statement issued under subsection (a) shall contain the following:(1) The period during which the individual was a victim of human trafficking or, if the individual is currently a victim of human trafficking, the approximate date the individual became a victim of human trafficking.(2) Any offense committed or citation issued that is a result of the individual's status as a victim of human trafficking.Section 3. Section 3032 of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 3032. [(Reserved).] State Human Trafficking Resource Coordinator.Subject to the availability of funds, the commission shall award a grant to a nonprofit organization to serve as the State Human Trafficking Resource Coordinator. The purpose of the coordinator shall be to:(1) Assist this Commonwealth in meeting the goals of the grant program established under section 3031 (relating to grants).(2) Provide aid and coordinate resources across this Commonwealth.(3) Assist in the identification of victims, as provided for under section 3027 (relating to victim determination statement).Section 4. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:20250SB0044PN1076 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1559. Restoration of operating privilege for victims of human trafficking.(a) Petition.--An individual who has been issued a victim determination statement under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3027 (relating to v ictim determination statement) or an entity acting on behalf of an individual who has been issued a victim determination statement, may file a petition, on a form prescribed by the department to the department, for relief from a suspension or revocation that the petitioner alleges was received as a direct result of being a victim of human trafficking. The petition shall include:(1) The victim determination statement.(2) The offense allegedly committed or citation issued to the petitioner as a direct result of being a victim of human trafficking.(b) Determination.--(1) If the victim determination statement demonstrates that the individual was a victim of human trafficking at the time that the individual's operating privilege was suspended or revoked and the department does not believe the individual poses a risk to traffic safety, the department shall restore the individual's operating privilege.(2) If the department declines to restore an individual's operating privilege because the department believes that the individual poses a risk to traffic safety, the department may require the individual to complete a driver improvement course and, upon completion of the driver improvement course, restore the individual's operating privilege.(c) Access to information.--For a suspension or revocation 20250SB0044PN1076 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 initiated by the department under section 6322 (relating to reports by issuing authorities) or 6323 (relating to reports by courts) or other agency or subdivision of this Commonwealth, the department may request relevant documents, including dockets, records, certifications by arresting officers, pleading and other papers, that the department requires to make a determination under subsection (b).(d) Response to request.--Upon request for documentation from the department, a court or other agency of this Commonwealth shall provide documentation to the department, unless the sharing of the document is in violation of Federal or State law.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0044PN1076 - 5 - 12345678910111213